Utah statutes.
11-36a-602.   Expenditure of impact fees.

(1)  A local political subdivision may expend impact fees only for a system improvement:

(a)  identified in the impact fee facilities plan; and

(b)  for the specific public facility type for which the fee was collected.

(2) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), a local political subdivision shall expend or encumber the impact fees for a permissible use within six years of their receipt.

(b)  A local political subdivision may hold the fees for longer than six years if it identifies, in writing:

(i)  an extraordinary and compelling reason why the fees should be held longer than six years; and

(ii)  an absolute date by which the fees will be expended.



Enacted by Chapter 47, 2011 General Session

